Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-603 Annual license. Societies
that are now authorized to transact business in this State may continue to
transact business until August 16, 2016. The authority of societies and all
societies hereafter issued a certificate of authority, may thereafter be
extended in accordance with section 432:2-108. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
1988, c 363, §2(7); am L 2012, c 251, §11; am L 2015, c 63, §15]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next